Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201277-2622
Common carrier;
unstamped cigarettes; bond; permit; violation; penalty.

Failure
to comply with section 77-2621 shall be cause for revocation of the permit
issued under section 77-2621 and
forfeiture of the bond posted pursuant to section 77-2621.

Laws 1951, c. 255, § 2, p. 877;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 38.